glossing/lexicons/preverbs.lexc
@U.V.iv@и'вэвык:@U.V.iv@и'в%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to start with a jerk
@U.V.iv@кэйик:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}йи INTER-V ;        ! to melt fat
@U.V.iv@кыргивык:@U.V.iv@кыргив INTER-V ;        ! to enjoy o.s
@U.V.iv@нутэсӄынӈэк:@U.V.iv@нутэсӄынӈ%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to take a muddy complexion
@U.V.tv@рыпытӄыивйивык:@U.V.tv@рыпытӄыивйив INTER-V ;        ! to compel to say
@U.V.iv@пэтатык:@U.V.iv@пэтат INTER-V ;        ! to fade
@U.V.tv@рытэйкэвэвык:@U.V.tv@рытэйкэвэв INTER-V ;        ! to oblige s.o
@U.V.tv@рынныткок:@U.V.tv@рыннытко INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.tv@рыԓымаԓявык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ԓымаԓяв INTER-V ;        ! to convince
@U.V.tv@черук:@U.V.tv@черу INTER-V ;        ! to fish
@U.V.tv@рыԓгаткаԓек:@U.V.tv@рыԓгаткаԓе INTER-V ;        ! to take a census
@U.V.iv@тэвыткок:@U.V.iv@тэвытко INTER-V ;        ! to wave
@U.V.iv@ԓывавык:@U.V.iv@ԓ%{ы%}вав INTER-V ;        ! not to be able
@U.V.iv@тиԓик:@U.V.iv@тиԓи INTER-V ;        ! to advance a string along a net
@U.V.iv@кэԓитвик:@U.V.iv@к%{Æ%}ԓитви INTER-V ;        ! to become literate
@U.V.tv@рычеэкэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}чеэкэв INTER-V ;        ! to unite
@U.V.tv@йыкыргатык:@U.V.tv@й%{ы%}кыргат INTER-V ;        ! to abuse
@U.V.iv@пывэнӈэк:@U.V.iv@пывэнӈэ INTER-V ;        ! to remain (of fat)
@U.V.tv@рэтчаӄавык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}этчаӄав INTER-V ;        ! to make well-known
@U.V.iv@чывачгынԓек:@U.V.iv@ч%{ы%}вачгынԓе INTER-V ;        ! to turn round
@U.V.iv@кочыраткок:@U.V.iv@кочыратко INTER-V ;        ! to play cards
@U.V.tv@гыйивыԓьэтык:@U.V.tv@г%{ы%}йивыԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to lead
@U.V.iv@ачгытатык:@U.V.iv@ачгытат INTER-V ;        ! to fall on one’s side
@U.V.iv@виԓтурэк:@U.V.iv@виԓтур%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to lose fermented smell
@U.V.tv@пытӄыкаԓевэтгавык:@U.V.tv@пытӄыкаԓевэтгав INTER-V ;        ! to read again
@U.V.iv@камчечывэтчак:@U.V.iv@камчечывэтча INTER-V ;        ! to stand stock still of confusion
@U.V.iv@паакэнтак:@U.V.iv@паакэнта INTER-V ;        ! go to peek (nuuqen, naukan)
@U.V.iv@мыкынӄамэтвавык:@U.V.iv@мыкынӄамэтвав INTER-V ;        ! пичкать едой
@U.V.iv@тамъёӈытвак:@U.V.iv@тамъёӈытва INTER-V ;        ! to be deceived
@U.V.iv@кытчытвак:@U.V.iv@кытчытва INTER-V ;        ! to brood, to sit on eggs
@U.V.tv@энантымӈэтвавык:@U.V.tv@энантымӈэтвав INTER-V ;        ! to leave s.o
@U.V.iv@кымгытынӈэк:@U.V.iv@кымгытынӈэ INTER-V ;        ! to wrinkle
@U.V.iv@вуԓӄытвинтэтык:@U.V.iv@вуԓӄытвинт%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to fall completely (of the night)
@U.V.iv@инэнԓювԓевык:@U.V.iv@ин%{Æ%}нԓювԓев INTER-V ;        ! to master
@U.V.iv@ээкэԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@ээкэԓьэт INTER-V ;        ! to light
@U.V.iv@рывъячавык:@U.V.iv@р%{ы%}въячав INTER-V ;        ! to be blown off by the blizzard
@U.V.iv@ейвэԓтурэк:@U.V.iv@ейв%{Æ%}ԓтур%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to come out of embarrassment
@U.V.iv@тимтиӈык:@U.V.iv@тимтиӈ INTER-V ;        ! to carry a slaughtered reindeer
@U.V.tv@рывъарэнтатык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}въарэнтат INTER-V ;        ! to tear into shreds
@U.V.iv@таԓяпатык:@U.V.iv@таԓяпат INTER-V ;        ! to prepare bouillon with crushed bones
@U.V.iv@пыгатык:@U.V.iv@п%{ы%}гат INTER-V ;        ! to tie floats to a net or to the side of a boat
@U.V.iv@йыӄыргаԓяк:@U.V.iv@йыӄыргаԓя INTER-V ;        ! to pass quickly
@U.V.iv@чымгунтэтык:@U.V.iv@чымгунт%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to free oneself
@U.V.iv@готытвак:@U.V.iv@готытва INTER-V ;        ! to keep on a lead
@U.V.iv@эԓгэӄатытвак:@U.V.iv@эԓгэӄатытва INTER-V ;        ! to hang
@U.V.iv@кукэнмигԓивык:@U.V.iv@кук%{Æ%}нмигԓив INTER-V ;        ! to cook
@U.V.iv@паантатык:@U.V.iv@паантат INTER-V ;        ! to dry up
@U.V.iv@рыгок:@U.V.iv@рыго INTER-V ;        ! to wear out
@U.V.iv@инэнэӈъэчевык:@U.V.iv@инэнэӈъ%{Æ%}чев INTER-V ;        ! to lie heavy on
@U.V.tv@кэӈкэԓтивык:@U.V.tv@кэӈк%{Æ%}ԓтив INTER-V ;        ! to strike with the extremity of a goad
@U.V.tv@минъутэйкык:@U.V.tv@минъут%{Æ%}йк INTER-V ;        ! tо turn, to fiddle
@U.V.iv@э’э’тык:@U.V.iv@э’э’т INTER-V ;        ! to take offence at sth
@U.V.iv@руԓтынтэтык:@U.V.iv@руԓтынт%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to twist
@U.V.iv@никъэеръук:@U.V.iv@никъ%{Æ%}еръу INTER-V ;        ! to blow (of north wind)
@U.V.tv@ръаӄаԓьыпаавык:@U.V.tv@ръаӄаԓьыпаав INTER-V ;        ! to reconcile enemies
@U.V.tv@роԓятык:@U.V.tv@роԓят INTER-V ;        ! to lean
@U.V.iv@пԓытковачык:@U.V.iv@пԓытковач INTER-V ;        ! to finish
@U.V.tv@рывантовык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}вантов INTER-V ;        ! to deliver
@U.V.iv@тъуроӈӈык:@U.V.iv@тъуроӈӈ INTER-V ;        ! to learn lessons
@U.V.iv@йиԓьэӈыттык:@U.V.iv@йиԓь%{Æ%}ӈытт INTER-V ;        ! to hunt spermophile
@U.V.tv@ԓывээк:@U.V.tv@ԓывээ INTER-V ;        ! to suck
@U.V.iv@пычытвак:@U.V.iv@пычытва INTER-V ;        ! to be beautiful
@U.V.iv@ӄорантак:@U.V.iv@ӄоранта INTER-V ;        ! to pasture a herd in the daytime
@U.V.iv@энаномаватык:@U.V.iv@энаномават INTER-V ;        ! to warm
@U.V.tv@рывэтгаватык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}вэтгават INTER-V ;        ! to reason with s.o
@U.V.iv@умӄук:@U.V.iv@умӄу INTER-V ;        ! to kill a polar bear
@U.V.iv@ӄымԓятык:@U.V.iv@ӄымԓят INTER-V ;        ! to plait a strap on a lasso (to make it heavier)
@U.V.iv@овъаԓяпэрак:@U.V.iv@овъаԓяпэра INTER-V ;        ! ch
@U.V.iv@ръэгиԓик:@U.V.iv@ръ%{Æ%}гиԓи INTER-V ;        ! que viens-tu fouiller quand je dors? what are you looking for when i sleep? чего ищешь, когда я спԓю?

@U.V.iv@кимэвык:@U.V.iv@ким%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! not to delay
@U.V.iv@ӄэтпэнарэрык:@U.V.iv@ӄэтпэнарэр INTER-V ;        ! to search carefully
@U.V.tv@рыначгытавык:@U.V.tv@рыначгытав INTER-V ;        ! to put sth
@U.V.iv@мыгыԓьатык:@U.V.iv@м%{ы%}гыԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to swallow with difficulty
@U.V.iv@топыпэрак:@U.V.iv@топыпэра INTER-V ;        ! to be voluminous
@U.V.tv@энатыёк:@U.V.tv@энатыё INTER-V ;        ! to pour
@U.V.iv@воԓӄыԓгавык:@U.V.iv@воԓӄыԓгав INTER-V ;        ! to fall (of the night)
@U.V.iv@выԓӄынток:@U.V.iv@выԓӄынто INTER-V ;        ! to extract coal
@U.V.iv@ԓымӈыԓык:@U.V.iv@ԓымӈыԓ INTER-V ;        ! to tell tales
@U.V.iv@равӄэргатык:@U.V.iv@равӄэргат INTER-V ;        ! to shine through
@U.V.iv@ачымъек:@U.V.iv@ачымъе INTER-V ;        ! to kill two animals
@U.V.iv@йъатык:@U.V.iv@йъат INTER-V ;        ! to get wet
@U.V.iv@кыкватъоԓёк:@U.V.iv@кыкватъоԓё INTER-V ;        ! to eat dried meat
@U.V.tv@ринтысӄивык:@U.V.tv@%{R%}интысӄив INTER-V ;        ! to be tossed
@U.V.iv@нирык:@U.V.iv@нир INTER-V ;        ! to grunt (of a mother calling its fawn, or of a male calling a female)
@U.V.iv@воԓӄытвэӄамэтвак:@U.V.iv@воԓӄытвэӄамэтва INTER-V ;        ! to have supper
@U.V.iv@рамэгԓетык:@U.V.iv@рамэгԓет INTER-V ;        ! to do the housework
@U.V.tv@рыпичыкэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}пичык%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to accustom
@U.V.iv@ӄамэнток:@U.V.iv@ӄамэнто INTER-V ;        ! to serve
@U.V.iv@раԓентак:@U.V.iv@раԓента INTER-V ;        ! to go and come back
@U.V.tv@ԓеӈпрорыԓвэк:@U.V.tv@ԓеӈпрорыԓвэ INTER-V ;        ! to cut one’s aorta
@U.V.iv@рыннотыԓякватык:@U.V.iv@рыннотыԓякват INTER-V ;        ! to take the field
@U.V.iv@мыӈэпчик:@U.V.iv@мыӈ%{Æ%}пчи INTER-V ;        ! to joke
@U.V.tv@рынԓявытвак:@U.V.tv@рынԓявытва INTER-V ;        ! to keep a fire burning
@U.V.iv@этԓятвак:@U.V.iv@этԓятва INTER-V ;        ! to rest
@U.V.tv@эӈэӈэтык:@U.V.tv@эӈэӈэт INTER-V ;        ! to paint with iodine
@U.V.iv@ӈэквъик:@U.V.iv@ӈ%{Æ%}квъи INTER-V ;        ! to become a widower
@U.V.tv@рыйимичгыръувык:@U.V.tv@рыйимичгыръув INTER-V ;        ! to warm
@U.V.tv@ивъюк:@U.V.tv@ивъю INTER-V ;        ! to tease
@U.V.iv@гытканымԓявык:@U.V.iv@гытканымԓяв INTER-V ;        ! to stretch one’s legs
@U.V.tv@тымӈэяак:@U.V.tv@тымӈэяа INTER-V ;        ! to make unfit
@U.V.iv@тинэнъэӄэвык:@U.V.iv@тинэнъэӄ%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to terrorize
@U.V.iv@ырынпыткок:@U.V.iv@ырынпытко INTER-V ;        ! to behave rudely
@U.V.tv@и'ԓгыттурэк:@U.V.tv@и'ԓгыттур%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to untie
@U.V.tv@риԓюткук:@U.V.tv@%{R%}иԓютку INTER-V ;        ! to move
@U.V.iv@увъэтык:@U.V.iv@увъ%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! то come (of sth
@U.V.iv@pыԓтэԓытвак:@U.V.iv@pыԓтэԓытва INTER-V ;        ! to lie
@U.V.iv@йъиԓкээвръук:@U.V.iv@йъиԓк%{Æ%}%{Æ%}връу INTER-V ;        ! to break out (of the thunder)
@U.V.tv@рыръэԓеттурэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ръ%{Æ%}ԓеттур%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to untangle
@U.V.tv@нинъэйвык:@U.V.tv@нинъ%{Æ%}йв INTER-V ;        ! order
@U.V.tv@ръэтыԓвэк:@U.V.tv@ръэтыԓвэ INTER-V ;        ! to bar s.o.’s way
@U.V.iv@гырыноӈавык:@U.V.iv@г%{ы%}рыноӈав INTER-V ;        ! to pluck up courage
@U.V.iv@кыттывэк:@U.V.iv@к%{ы%}ттывэ INTER-V ;        ! то become more difficult
@U.V.iv@рэвырагтык:@U.V.iv@рэвырагт INTER-V ;        ! to come back from the pasture
@U.V.iv@рынныкватык:@U.V.iv@рынныкват INTER-V ;        ! to stick (of teeth)
@U.V.iv@пынитык:@U.V.iv@п%{ы%}нит INTER-V ;        ! to tie the straps of one’s boots
@U.V.iv@гыргоԓятык:@U.V.iv@гыргоԓят INTER-V ;        ! to rise
@U.V.tv@рычиитвэтык:@U.V.tv@рычиитв%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to warm up
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@э’ӄэԓьэт INTER-V ;        ! to be enemies
@U.V.iv@ы'ԓвыяԓятык:@U.V.iv@ы'ԓвыяԓят INTER-V ;        ! to blow (of snow blizzard)
@U.V.iv@э’ӄэйвыԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@э’ӄэйвыԓьэт INTER-V ;        ! to complain
@U.V.iv@а'ԓягыенток:@U.V.iv@а'ԓягыенто INTER-V ;        ! to withdraw guts out of a carcass
@U.V.iv@нитԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@нитԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to grunt (of a reindeer)
@U.V.tv@ръаӄатвак:@U.V.tv@ръаӄатва INTER-V ;        ! to incite to behave badly
@U.V.iv@тааткок:@U.V.iv@таатко INTER-V ;        ! to tread a skin
@U.V.tv@энанрамавык:@U.V.tv@энанрамав INTER-V ;        ! to cut thin bits of meat
@U.V.iv@ӄэргычьатык:@U.V.iv@ӄэргычьат INTER-V ;        ! to have windows
@U.V.iv@кукъунӈэк:@U.V.iv@кукъунӈ%{Æ%} INTER-V ;        ! to be covered with warts
@U.V.tv@рывииԓевыԓьэтык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}вииԓевыԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to photograph
@U.V.iv@таӈэръэпык:@U.V.iv@таӈэръэп INTER-V ;        ! to dress up
@U.V.tv@рыгнарык:@U.V.tv@рыгнар INTER-V ;        ! to singe
@U.V.tv@рыяԓгытатык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}яԓгытат INTER-V ;        ! to recopy
@U.V.iv@уувэтык:@U.V.iv@уув%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to appear (of something dark)
@U.V.iv@инэчымкэтык:@U.V.iv@инэчымк%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to muffle o.s
@U.V.tv@миԓгэрыткук:@U.V.tv@миԓг%{Æ%}рытку INTER-V ;        ! to fire at s.o
@U.V.tv@таӈынӄэргавык:@U.V.tv@таӈынӄэргав INTER-V ;        ! to light up, to be reflected
@U.V.iv@ивмъэтук:@U.V.iv@ивмъ%{Æ%}ту INTER-V ;        ! to grow black after dying
@U.V.iv@рыгнэԓёк:@U.V.iv@рыгнэԓё INTER-V ;        ! to fall (of hair)
@U.V.iv@виԓыткук:@U.V.iv@виԓытку INTER-V ;        ! to trade
@U.V.iv@чемгъояак:@U.V.iv@чемгъояа INTER-V ;        ! to concentrate
@U.V.iv@вэтгыԓьатык:@U.V.iv@вэтгыԓьат INTER-V ;        ! to approve
@U.V.iv@энаноԓятык:@U.V.iv@энаноԓят INTER-V ;        ! to train a young reindeer to draw a sledge
@U.V.tv@рыгыткынатык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}гыткынат INTER-V ;        ! to cover s.o.’s hair
@U.V.tv@рымынгыквавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}мынгыквав INTER-V ;        ! to remunerate
@U.V.iv@ԓиӈиԓюԓьэтык:@U.V.iv@ԓиӈиԓюԓь%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to worry
@U.V.iv@чачатвэк:@U.V.iv@чачатвэ INTER-V ;        ! to become appetizing
@U.V.tv@рыкуԓюмкыԓьэвык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}куԓюмкыԓь%{Æ%}в INTER-V ;        ! to turn quicker
@U.V.tv@пэмэткук:@U.V.tv@пэм%{Æ%}тку INTER-V ;        ! to push
@U.V.tv@йыннэԓёк:@U.V.tv@йыннэԓё INTER-V ;        ! to stir the fire during a rite
@U.V.iv@ӄэтвэтръук:@U.V.iv@ӄэтв%{Æ%}тръу INTER-V ;        ! to kill one another
@U.V.iv@кыевысӄычетык:@U.V.iv@к%{ы%}евысӄычет INTER-V ;        ! to wake up with a start
@U.V.tv@ръэнӄэвэвык:@U.V.tv@ръэнӄэвэв INTER-V ;        ! to satisfy s.o.'s hunger
@U.V.tv@рыръэчевык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}ръэчев INTER-V ;        ! to perplex
@U.V.tv@йымэк:@U.V.tv@й%{ы%}мэ INTER-V ;        ! to hang
@U.V.tv@пыԓёткок:@U.V.tv@п%{ы%}ԓётко INTER-V ;        ! to gnaw
@U.V.tv@инэнъимпэтык:@U.V.tv@ин%{Æ%}нъимп%{Æ%}т INTER-V ;        ! to cover
@U.V.iv@тагъенчатъыԓык:@U.V.iv@тагъенчатъыԓ INTER-V ;        ! to get a sore throat
@U.V.iv@ирык:@U.V.iv@ир INTER-V ;        ! to let oneself to fall
@U.V.tv@рыраквачавык:@U.V.tv@р%{ы%}раквачав INTER-V ;        ! to kill
